Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1426
Income, defined.

Income shall mean any money or thing of value received, or to be received as a claim on future services, whether in the form of a fee, salary, expense, allowance, forbearance, forgiveness, interest, dividend, royalty, rent, capital gain, or any other form of recompense then constituting income under the Internal Revenue Code.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 26.